Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 3
HIGHWAY ANTICIPATION WARRANTS

43-4-301. Legislative declaration.

Because of the rapid growth of the economy of this state which has given rise to a greatly increased use of the public highways and roads and because of the fact that the existing roads and highways are insufficient by reason of the greatly expanded use of vehicular transportation thereon, it is declared to be the policy and purpose of the general assembly to make adequate provision for an expanded and improved network of highways and roads so as to serve properly the needs of the present-day economy.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 740, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-1.

43-4-302. Powers of commission - contracts approval.

The transportation commission is authorized to enter into contracts with the federal government, the state of Colorado and any of its institutions and agencies, counties, municipalities, districts, and any other political subdivisions of the state, and any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof, or any political or public corporation of the state or with private investors necessary or incident to the performance of its duties and execution of its powers under this section; except that any contract relating to the financing of any such construction, improvement, and reconstruction of highways and bridges shall be approved by the governor before the same becomes effective.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 740, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-2.

L. 73:

p. 1415, § 88.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1128, § 203, effective July 1.

43-4-303. Anticipation warrants - issuance - sale - fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 741, § 3. p. 745, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-3.

L. 73:

p. 1415, § 89.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1128, § 204, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 297, § 63, effective August 8.

43-4-304. Interest - terms - public sale. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

pp. 741, 746, §§ 4, 4.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-15.

L. 57:

p. 638, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-4.

L. 91:

(2) to (5) amended, p. 1129, § 205, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 297, § 64, effective August 8.

43-4-305. Warrants legal investments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 741, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-16.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-5.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 299, § 65, effective August 8.

43-4-306. Signatures validated. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 742, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-6.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 299, § 66, effective August 8.

43-4-307. Sinking fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 742, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-7.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1130, § 206, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 299, § 67, effective August 8.

43-4-308. Redemption. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 742, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-19.

L. 57:

p. 640, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-8.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1130, § 207, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 299, § 68, effective August 8.

43-4-309. Warrant obligations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

pp. 742, 748, §§ 9, 5.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

120-11-9.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 208, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 300, § 69, effective August 8.

43-4-310. Obligation only from highway fund. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 743, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-10.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 209, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 300, § 70, effective August 8.

43-4-311. Authority not in derogation of existing powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 743, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-11.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 210, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 300, § 71, effective August 8.

43-4-312. Full authority. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 743, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-12.

L. 73:

p. 1415, § 90.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1131, § 211, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 300, § 72, effective August 8.

43-4-313. Authorization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 745, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-14.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 212, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 301, § 73, effective August 8.

43-4-314. Highway building fund obligations unaffected. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 748, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 120-11-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-15.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 213, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 301, § 74, effective August 8.

43-4-315. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 800, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-16.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1132, § 214, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 301, § 75, effective August 8.

43-4-316. Additional powers. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 800, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-17.

L. 89:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1600, § 22, effective July 1, 1993.

L. 91:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), and (1)(c) amended, p. 1132, § 215, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 301, § 76, effective August 8.

43-4-317. Execution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 801, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-18.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 302, § 77, effective August 8.

43-4-318. Legal investments. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 801, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 120-11-19.

L. 89:

Entire section amended, p. 1133, § 79, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 302, § 78, effective August 8.